Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2317.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 28-626, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE28-626. Uniform application of laws throughout state; local ordinances or regulations A. The provisions of This chapter and chapters 4 and 5 of this title are applicable and uniform throughout this state and in all political subdivisions in of this state. B. A local authority: 1. Shall not enact or enforce an ordinance or regulation in conflict with this chapter or chapter 4 or 5 of this title unless expressly authorized by this chapter or chapter 4 or 5 of this title. 2. May adopt additional traffic regulations that are not in conflict with this chapter or chapter 4 or 5 of this title. 3. Except as provided in paragraph 4 of this subsection, shall adopt ordinances or regulations relating to the control and movement of traffic, including parking or standing ordinances or regulations that provide for the imposition of civil penalties on the violation of the ordinance or regulation. 4. Shall not enact or enforce an ordinance or regulation that prohibits cruising.  For the purposes of this paragraph, "cruising" means the repetitive driving of a motor vehicle past the same place without a destination or particular purpose within a specified time period. C. Unless a local ordinance or regulation provides for the imposition of a criminal penalty, a violation of the ordinance or regulation constitutes a civil traffic violation. END_STATUTE